Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-4,115
Fees; allocation; state identification card; no fee, when.

(1) Fees for operators' licenses and state identification cards shall be collected by department personnel or the county treasurer and distributed according to the table in subsection (2) of this section, except for the ignition interlock permit and associated fees as outlined in subsection (4) of this section and the 24/7 sobriety program permit and associated fees as outlined in subsection (5) of this section. County officials shall remit the county portion of the fees collected to the county treasurer for placement in the county general fund. All other fees collected shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the appropriate fund.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (7) of this section, the fees provided in this subsection in the following dollar amounts apply for operators' licenses and state identification cards.

DepartmentCounty of MotorDocumentTotalGeneralVehiclesFeeFundCash Fund

State identification card:Valid for 1 year or less5.002.752.25Valid for more than 1 yearbut not more than 2 years10.002.757.25Valid for more than 2 yearsbut not more than 3 years14.002.7511.25Valid for more than 3 yearsbut not more than 4 years19.002.7516.25Valid for more than 4 yearsfor a person under 2124.002.7521.25Valid for 5 years24.003.5020.50Replacement11.002.758.25Class O or M operator's license:Valid for 1 year or less5.002.752.25Valid for more than 1 yearbut not more than 2 years10.002.757.25Valid for more than 2 yearsbut not more than 3 years14.002.7511.25Valid for more than 3 yearsbut not more than 4 years19.002.7516.25Valid for 5 years24.003.5020.50Bioptic or telescopic lens restriction:Valid for 1 year or less5.0005.00Valid for more than 1 yearbut not more than 2 years10.002.757.25Replacement11.002.758.25Add, change, or remove class,endorsement, or restriction5.0005.00Provisional operator's permit:Original15.002.7512.25Bioptic or telescopic lens restriction:Valid for 1 year or less5.0005.00Valid for more than 1 yearbut not more than 2 years15.002.7512.25Replacement11.002.758.25Add, change, or remove class,endorsement, or restriction5.0005.00LPD-learner's permit:Original8.00.257.75Replacement11.002.758.25Add, change, or remove class,endorsement, or restriction5.0005.00LPE-learner's permit:Original8.00.257.75Replacement11.002.758.25Add, change, or remove class,endorsement, or restriction5.0005.00School permit:Original8.00.257.75Replacement11.002.758.25Add, change, or remove class,endorsement, or restriction5.0005.00Farm permit:Original or renewal5.00.254.75Replacement5.00.254.75Add, change, or remove class,endorsement, or restriction5.0005.00Driving permits:Employment45.00045.00Medical hardship45.00045.00Replacement10.00.259.75Add, change, or remove class,endorsement, or restriction5.0005.00Commercial driver's license:Valid for 1 year or less11.001.759.25Valid for more than 1 yearbut not more than 2 years22.001.7520.25Valid for more than 2 yearsbut not more than 3 years33.001.7531.25Valid for more than 3 yearsbut not more than 4 years44.001.7542.25Valid for 5 years55.001.7553.25Bioptic or telescopic lens restriction:Valid for one year or less11.001.759.25Valid for more than 1 yearbut not more than 2 years22.001.7520.25Replacement11.002.758.25Add, change, or remove class,endorsement, or restriction10.001.758.25CLP-commercial learner's permit:Original10.00.259.75Replacement10.00.259.75Add, change, or remove class,endorsement, or restriction10.00.259.75

(3) If the department issues an operator's license or a state identification card and collects the fees, the department shall remit the county portion of the fees to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.

(4)(a) The fee for an ignition interlock permit shall be forty-five dollars. Five dollars of the fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund. Forty dollars of the fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles Ignition Interlock Fund.

(b) The fee for a replacement ignition interlock permit shall be eleven dollars. Two dollars and seventy-five cents of the fee shall be remitted to the county treasurer for credit to the county general fund. Eight dollars and twenty-five cents of the fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.

(c) The fee for adding, changing, or removing a class, endorsement, or restriction on an ignition interlock permit shall be five dollars. The fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.

(5)(a) The fee for a 24/7 sobriety program permit shall be forty-five dollars. Forty dollars of the fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund. Five dollars of the fee shall be remitted to the county treasurer for credit to the county general fund.

(b) The fee for a replacement 24/7 sobriety program permit shall be eleven dollars. Two dollars and seventy-five cents of the fee shall be remitted to the county treasurer for credit to the county general fund. Eight dollars and twenty-five cents of the fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.

(c) The fee for adding, changing, or removing a class, endorsement, or restriction on a 24/7 sobriety program permit shall be five dollars. The fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.

(6) The department and its agents may collect an identity security fee to cover the cost of security and technology practices used to protect the identity of applicants for and holders of operators' licenses and state identification cards and to reduce identity theft, fraud, and forgery and counterfeiting of such licenses and cards to the maximum extent possible. The fee shall be in addition to all other required fees for operators' licenses and state identification cards. The amount of the fee shall be determined by the department. The fee shall not exceed eight dollars. The fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer for credit to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund.

(7) No fee shall be charged for issuance of an original, renewal, or replacement state identification card to a resident of Nebraska who is also a United States citizen and who does not have a valid Nebraska driver's license.

Laws 1929, c. 148, § 7, p. 515;

C.S.1929, § 60-407;

Laws 1931, c. 101, § 2, p. 272;

Laws 1937, c. 148, § 17, p. 515;

Laws 1941, c. 128, § 1, p. 483;

Laws 1941, c. 176, § 1, p. 687;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 60-407;

R.S.1943, § 60-409;

Laws 1945, c. 141, § 6, p. 452;

Laws 1947, c. 207, § 3, p. 677;

Laws 1949, c. 181, § 3, p. 525;

Laws 1951, c. 195, § 12, p. 742;

Laws 1955, c. 242, § 1, p. 757;

Laws 1957, c. 366, § 39, p. 1273;

Laws 1961, c. 315, § 7, p. 1004;

Laws 1961, c. 316, § 7, p. 1014;

Laws 1963, c. 359, § 2, p. 1151;

Laws 1967, c. 234, § 3, p. 624;

Laws 1976, LB 329, § 2;

Laws 1977, LB 90, § 5;

Laws 1981, LB 207, § 1;

Laws 1985, Second Spec. Sess., LB 5, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-409;

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 65;

Laws 1992, LB 319, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 491, § 12;

Laws 1995, LB 467, § 11;

Laws 1998, LB 309, § 5;

Laws 1998, LB 320, § 5;

Laws 1999, LB 704, § 17;

Laws 2001, LB 574, § 11;

Laws 2005, LB 1, § 5;

Laws 2006, LB 1008, § 2;

Laws 2008, LB736, § 4;

Laws 2008, LB911, § 12;

Laws 2009, LB497, § 3;

Laws 2011, LB170, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB215, § 13;

Laws 2011, LB667, § 28;

Laws 2014, LB777, § 4;

Laws 2014, LB983, § 17;

Laws 2016, LB311, § 10;

Laws 2018, LB347, § 1;

Laws 2021, LB113, § 27;

Laws 2021, LB271, § 10;

Laws 2022, LB750, § 53;

Laws 2023, LB138, § 22;

Laws 2023, LB514, § 20;

Laws 2024, LB287, § 70;

Laws 2024, LB1200, § 30;

Laws 2025, LB97, § 25.